Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 1. Generally

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Modern status of rules governing interference with drainage of surface waters, 93 ALR3d 1193.

Public rights of recreational boating, fishing, wading, or the like, in inland stream, the bed of which is privately owned, 6 ALR4th 1030.

§ 41-3-101.
Nature of water rights and beneficial use.

A water right is a right
to use the water of the state, when such use has been acquired by
the beneficial application of water under the laws of the state relating
thereto, and in conformity with the rules and regulations dependent
thereon. Beneficial use shall be the basis, the measure and limit
of the right to use water at all times, not exceeding the statutory
limit except as provided by W.S.

41-4-317

. In addition to any beneficial use specified by law or
rule and regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, the use of water
for the purpose of extracting heat therefrom is considered a beneficial
use subject to prior rights. Water being always the property of the
state, rights to its use shall attach to the land for irrigation,
or to such other purposes or object for which acquired in accordance
with the beneficial use made for which the right receives public recognition,
under the law and the administration provided thereby. Water rights
for the direct use of the natural unstored flow of any stream cannot
be detached from the lands, place or purpose for which they are acquired,
except as provided in W.S.

41-3-102

and

41-3-103

, pertaining to a change to preferred use, and except
as provided in W.S.

41-4-514

.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 68, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 724; C.S. 1920, § 832; Laws 1921, ch. 161, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-401; Laws 1941, ch. 25, § 1; 1945, ch. 118, § 2; C.S. 1945, 71-401; W.S. 1957, § 41-2; Laws 1981, ch. 28, § 1.

Legislature has power to regulate the appropriation of water.

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1911).

“Water right” defined. —

A “water right” is the right to use water of the state when such use has been acquired by beneficial application of the water under the laws and rules and regulations of the state relating thereto. Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1925).

Water rights are real property rights

which become vested as of the time the application for appropriation is filed, if the right is adjudicated. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Where appropriation was made as of April 1887, and adjudicated by decree before statehood in 1889, for 7.2 cu. ft. of water to irrigate an unspecified 90 acres of land, which, used on certain lands for some years, was since 1930, transferred by use in part to other lands of same ownership, through an extension of original ditch, such appropriation, applied to a beneficial use, is a “property right” and cannot be abridged without infringing upon constitutional right of the owner. Hughes v. Lincoln Land Co., 27 F. Supp. 972, 1939 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2772 (D. Wyo. 1939).

Water rights taxable as part of lands using water. —

Irrigation works located in Albany county which furnished water to 54,000 acres in Platte county under permitted appropriations for 63,500 acres were not proportionately taxable in Albany county where the evidence showed that there was not sufficient water to irrigate lands in excess of 54,000 acres, since water rights are only taxable along with and as a part of lands using the water. Wheatland Indus. Co. v. Johnson, 64 Wyo. 120, 186 P.2d 377,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1947).

Only natural waters subject to appropriation. —

In view of art. 8, § 1, Wyo. Const., only waters of natural streams, springs or lakes are subject to appropriation. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

Where during course of 30 years seepage water flowing down a draw finally made a regular, natural stream with definite channels and banks, waters thereof are subject to appropriation. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

“Watercourse” defined. —

A “watercourse” is a stream of water usually flowing in a particular direction, with well defined banks and channels, but the water need not flow continuously, and the channel may sometimes be dry. State v. Hiber, 48 Wyo. 172, 44 P.2d 1005,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1935).

Private waters cannot be appropriated. —

An attempted appropriation of waste and seepage waters, being private waters, is void. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

Seepage and waste water is private water so long as it is on the lands from which it originates and such water cannot be appropriated by adjoining landowners. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

Evidence failed to sustain state's contention that a draw is a natural stream, where it is dry most of the time, is covered with grass, and has no banks; and where so far as the evidence shows it has no natural outlet. State v. Hiber, 48 Wyo. 172, 44 P.2d 1005,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1935).

Water rights not acquired by adverse possession. —

The court correctly dismissed a complaint seeking determination of ownership in water rights by virtue of adverse possession, for the simple reason that water rights may not be acquired by adverse possession or prescription in this state. Lewis v. State Bd. of Control, 699 P.2d 822,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 483

(Wyo. 1985).

Beneficial use foundation of water rights. —

Beneficial use is the ultimate foundation of every water right under the priority of appropriation system prevailing in the arid states. Lincoln Land Co. v. Davis, 27 F. Supp. 1006, 1939 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1939).

Right to use of water may be acquired by priority of appropriation for beneficial purposes, in contravention of common-law rule that every riparian owner is entitled to continued natural flow of waters of the stream running through or adjacent to his lands. Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1900).

In Wyoming an appropriation which is not useful is of no effect for under the law of the state, beneficial use is the basis, measure and limit of all appropriation. Ide v. United States, 263 U.S. 497, 44 S. Ct. 182, 68 L. Ed. 407, 1924 U.S. LEXIS 2813 (U.S. 1924); John Meier & Son v. Horse Creek Conservation Dist., 603 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1979).

Beneficial use is dependent upon particular circumstance of each case.

John Meier & Son v. Horse Creek Conservation Dist., 603 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1979).

Actual diversion of water is not necessary to appropriate water for beneficial use.

In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

Right to appropriate water subject to rights of prior appropriators.
—

Pursuant to art. 8, § 2, Wyo. Const., and the statutes adopted by the Wyoming legislature, water rights are perfected by the filing of an application for a water permit which then is adjudicated to the applicant by the board of control after the board has determined that the applicant does have such a right by beneficial use. The right of a citizen of Wyoming to appropriate water for purposes of irrigation is defined and limited by these statutes. Each appropriator, in turn, takes his right subject to the right of any prior appropriators from the stream. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Right to use of water for beneficial purposes depends upon prior appropriation and it existed before there was any legislation upon the subject. Moyer v. Preston, 6 Wyo. 308, 44 P. 845,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1896).

Quantity of water each appropriator is entitled to divert

at any particular time is the quantity within the limits of the decree under the laws, reasonably necessary for the acreage stated in the decree. Quinn v. John Whitaker Ranch Co., 54 Wyo. 367, 92 P.2d 568,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1939).

Point of diversion. —

City did not lose its adjudicated rights of priority under original appropriation by a mere change in point of diversion under adjudication by state board of control, where amount of water used by city after change exceeded flow in the entire watershed. Van Tassel Real Estate & Livestock Co. v. Cheyenne, 49 Wyo. 333, 54 P.2d 906,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 299 U.S. 574, 57 S. Ct. 38, 81 L. Ed. 423, 1936 U.S. LEXIS 282 (U.S. 1936).

Appropriator of water for irrigation purposes is not entitled to change place of diversion, where the change would injuriously affect another appropriator, if at all. Groo v. Sights, 22 Wyo. 19, 134 P. 269,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1913).

Duty of officers. —

It is duty of officers charged with superintendence of diversion of waters to make distribution in accordance with adjudications. Quinn v. John Whitaker Ranch Co., 54 Wyo. 367, 92 P.2d 568,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1939).

Attachment to land. —

A water right upon land, which is mentioned in the application and permit for appropriation, becomes attached to that land when it is finally adjudicated and cannot be subsequently severed from it or conveyed in derogation of the rights of the state. White v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 595 P.2d 76,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1979).

A water right, by direct flow from a stream, shall be attached to land to be irrigated, which must be designated from initiation of the right until it is perfected. Scherck v. Nichols, 55 Wyo. 4, 95 P.2d 74,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1939).

In absence of any permitted corrections an adjudicated water right becomes attached to lands as described in the application and permit. Scherck v. Nichols, 55 Wyo. 4, 95 P.2d 74,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1939).

And to government lands. —

Fact that lands belonging to defendant were government lands when appropriation was taken out is immaterial, if the lands were included in the appropriation and water beneficially applied to them. Lincoln Land Co. v. Davis, 27 F. Supp. 1006, 1939 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1939) (decided under prior law).

Nonriparian uses. —

Under doctrine of prior appropriation it is not essential to a water right that appropriator should apply the water upon riparian lands. Willey v. Decker, 11 Wyo. 496, 73 P. 210,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1903).

Decreed amount of water may be prima facie evidence of appropriator's entitlement,

but such evidence may be rebutted by showing actual historic beneficial use. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

And appropriator may not sell surplus water. —

As an appropriator of water obtains by his appropriation that only of which he makes a beneficial use, it necessarily follows that he cannot sell surplus water which he does not need, while retaining his original appropriations. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

As court will interfere on showing of waste. —

If a seller-appropriator or a buyer is shown to have committed waste, or that they intend the commission of waste, a court will interfere with their water rights. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Waters belong to the public,

and an appropriator cannot acquire a right that permits him to use more than is reasonably necessary for beneficial purposes. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Reservoir rights were properly conveyed. —

Summary judgment was properly awarded to defendants in assignees'
action challenging the validity of an easement, based on the fact that reservoir rights which were permitted for irrigation did not impact the ownership of the rights conveyed by the Wyoming State Board of Land Commissioners to the Wyoming Game and Fish Commission. Bentley v. Office of State Lands, 2007 WY 94, 160 P.3d 1109,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(June 8, 2007).

Wrongful use of water. —

Party has no right to irrigate land for which no appropriation has been taken out and owner of permit has no right to grant use of water for lands other than those to which appropriation applied since the water belongs to the state. Lincoln Land Co. v. Davis, 27 F. Supp. 1006, 1939 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1939).

Waste. —

Statute providing that no allotment of irrigation water shall exceed one cubic foot per second for each 70 acres of land (§

41-4-317

) is not a legislative declaration that use of water in excess thereof under an adjudication granting a larger amount is prima facie evidence of waste. Quinn v. John Whitaker Ranch Co., 54 Wyo. 367, 92 P.2d 568,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1939).

Concept of beneficial use deemed continuing obligation. —

Beneficial use is not a concept which is considered only at the time an appropriation is obtained. The concept represents a continuing obligation which must be satisfied in order for the appropriation to remain viable. The state's abandonment statutes (§§

41-3-401

and

41-3-402

) are recognition of this requirement. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. State Bd. of Control, 578 P.2d 557,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1978).

Supplemental water rights are subject to abandonment under
§§

41-3-401

and

41-3-402

. Hofeldt v. Eyre, 849 P.2d 1295,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1993).

Ex parte proceedings. —

Holder of certificate of appropriation could not, in ex parte proceeding before state board of control, obtain an adjudication clarifying the certificate, but excluding from right to use water, lands of others included in the description contained in the certificate. Lincoln Land Co. v. Davis, 27 F. Supp. 1006, 1939 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1939).

Injunction denied. —

In suit to quiet title to certain irrigation waters, to which both plaintiff and defendant obtained title from same predecessor, and which defendant for more than 25 years had permissively used on land within original description of lands to be irrigated, an injunctional order denying defendant further use thereof will be denied. Lincoln Land Co. v. Davis, 27 F. Supp. 1006, 1939 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2789 (D. Wyo. 1939).

Board of control was not necessary party to appeal

taken by a city from an order of the board granting the application of one desiring to appropriate water which the city claimed, notwithstanding §

41-4-517

, providing attorney general shall represent the board on such an appeal. Hunt v. Laramie, 26 Wyo. 160, 181 P. 137,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1919), limited, Bower v. Big Horn Canal Ass'n, 77 Wyo. 80, 307 P.2d 593,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1957).

Applied

in

Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

State v. Laramie Rivers Co., 59 Wyo. 9, 136 P.2d 487,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(1943); Nebraska v. Wyoming, 325 U.S. 589, 65 S. Ct. 1332, 66 S. Ct. 1, 89 L. Ed. 1815, 1945 U.S. LEXIS 2620 (1945); Biddick v. Laramie Valley Mun. Irrigation Dist., 76 Wyo. 67, 299 P.2d 1059,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1956); In re Estate & Guardianship of Johnson, 78 Wyo. 199, 322 P.2d 145 (1958); Bales v. Ankney, 382 P.2d 386,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1963); Goshen Irrigation Dist. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Control, 926 P.2d 943,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1996); In re Gen. Adjudication of All Rights, 2004 WY 21, 85 P.3d 981,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For address, “Decrees in Interstate Water Suits,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 13.

For article “Rights of Wyoming Appropriators in Underground Water,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 111.

For article, “Record Title of Water and Ditch Rights,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 200.

For article, “The Concept of Reasonable Beneficial Use in the Law of Surface Streams,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 1 (1957).

For note, “Forfeiture of Water Rights in Wyoming,” see 14 Wyo. L.J. 51 (1959).

For article, “Law, Water and People: The Role of Water Law in Conserving and Developing Natural Resources in the West,” see 18 Wyo. L.J. 3 (1963).

For article, “Priority and Progress — Case Studies in the Transfer of Water Rights,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1966).

For comment, “Water Appropriation for Recreation,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 209 (1966).

For article, “Legal Aspects of Weather Modification Snowpack Augmentation in Wyoming,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1967).

For article, “Transfer of Water Rights — Errata and Addenda — Sales for Recreational Purposes and to Districts,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 321 (1967).

For comment, “Improvement of Existing Water Rights Through Unification — A Case Study on the Consolidation of Appropriations,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 327 (1967).

For comment, “The Federal Reserved Water Doctrine — Application to the Problem of Water for Oil Shale Development,” see III Land & Water L. Rev. 75 (1968).

For comment, “Determining Quantity in Irrigation Appropriations,” see IV Land & Water L. Rev. 501 (1969).

For article, “The Disparity Between State Water Rights Records and Actual Water Use Patterns,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 23 (1970).

For comment, “The Transfer of Water Rights for Use in the Oil Industry,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 441 (1970).

For article, “Geothermal Resources: A Primer for the Practitioner,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 327 (1974).

For comment, “‘It's Our Water!’ — Can Wyoming Constitutionally Prohibit the Exportation of State Waters?,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 119 (1975).

For comment, “Changing Manner and Place of Use of Water Rights in Wyoming,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1975).

For comment, “Water Saved or Water Lost: The Consequences of Individual Conservation Measures in the Appropriation States,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1976).

For comment, “Water Law — Cessation of Return Flow as a Means of Complying with Pollution Control Laws,” see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 431 (1977).

For comment, “Statutory Recognition of Instream Flow Preservation: A Proposed Solution for Wyoming,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 139 (1982).

For comment, “Sporhase v. Nebraska ex rel. Douglas: State Control of Water Under the Constraints of the Commerce Clause,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 513 (1983).

For casenote, “Water Law — The State Engineer's Authority with Reference to Change of Use, Place of Use, Point of Diversion, and Means of Conveyance of Water Embraced by Water Permits: Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 59 (1984).

For casenote, “Water Rights — Impairment of Existing Water Rights Under the Wyoming Watershed Act: Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 83 (1984).

For casenote, “Water Law — Standing Requirement Under the Wyoming Forfeiture Statute: Platte County Grazing Association v. State Board of Control, 675 P.2d 1279,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1984),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 485 (1984).

For comment, “Forfeiture Proceedings in Wyoming Water Law: The Legislature Revives Private Standing,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 459 (1985).

For comment, “Wyoming's New Instream Flow Act: An Administrative Quagmire,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1986).

For article, “The Complexities of Managing Hydrologically Connected Surface Water and Groundwater Under the Appropriation Doctrine,” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 63 (1987).

For article, “Aldo Leopold and Western Water Law: Thinking Perpendicular to the Prior Appropriation Doctrine,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1989).

For casenote, “Water Law — Drawing the Line on Indian Reserved Water Rights: No ‘Super-Walton’ Rights in Wyoming's Big Horn River System. In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 899 P.2d 848,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 425 (1996).

For article, "Establishing Appropriate Water Quality Numeric StandardsUnder the Clean Water Act; Lessons From a Case Study of Coalbed MethaneProduced Water Discharge to the Powder River, Wyoming and Montana”, see 11 Wyo. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Remedy of tenant against stranger for wrongful pollution of waters, 12 ALR2d 1192.

Liability for pollution of stream by oil, water or the like flowing from well, 19 ALR2d 1025.

Right of riparian owner to continuation of periodic and seasonal overflow from stream under doctrine of appropriation, 20 ALR2d 633.

Liability for overflow or escape of water from excavation made in course of construction, 23 ALR2d 827.

Loss of private easement with respect to waters by nonuser, 25 ALR2d 1265.

Liability for damages from obstruction of stream by debris or waste, 29 ALR2d 447.

Liability of person obstructing stream, ravine, or similar area by debris or waste, for damages caused by flooding or the like, 29 ALR2d 447.

Liability of landowner for damages caused by overflow, seepage, or the like, resulting from defect in artificial underground drain, conduit or pipe, 44 ALR2d 960.

Applicability of rules of accretion and reliction so as to confer title to additions upon owner of island or bar in navigable stream, 54 ALR2d 643.

Relative riparian or littoral rights respecting the removal of water from a natural, private, nonnavigable lake, 54 ALR2d 1450.

Acquisition by adverse possession or use of public property held by governmental unit, 55 ALR2d 554.

Easement by prescription in artificial drains, 55 ALR2d 1144.

Grants and reservations as affecting validity of regulation of bathing, swimming, boating, fishing or the like to protect public water supply, 56 ALR2d 790.

Rights of boating and fishing or the like on inland lakes, 57 ALR2d 569.

Right of public in shore of inland navigable lakes between high and low water marks, 40 ALR3d 776.

Modern status of rules governing interference with drainage of surface waters, 93 ALR3d 1193.

Extinguishment by prescription of natural servitude for drainage of surface waters, 42 ALR4th 462.

Liability for diversion of surface water by raising surface level of land, 88 ALR4th 891.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
113.02 (Matthew Bender).

§ 41-3-102.
Preferred uses; defined; order of preference.

Water rights are hereby defined as follows according to use: preferred uses shall include rights for domestic and transportation purposes, steam power plants, and industrial purposes; existing rights not preferred, may be condemned to supply water for such preferred uses in accordance with the provisions of the law relating to condemnation of property for public and semi-public purposes except as hereinafter provided.

Preferred water uses shall have preference rights in the following order:

Water for drinking purposes for both man and beast;

Water for municipal purposes;

Water for the use of steam engines and for general railway use, water for culinary, laundry, bathing, refrigerating (including the manufacture of ice), for steam and hot water heating plants, and steam power plants; and

Industrial purposes.

The use of water for irrigation shall be superior and preferred to any use where water turbines or impulse water wheels are installed for power purposes; provided, however, that the preferred use of steam power plants and industrial purposes herein granted shall not be construed to give the right of condemnation.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 68, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 725; C.S. 1920, § 833; R.S. 1931, § 122-402; C.S. 1945, § 71-402; Laws 1955, ch. 227, § 1; 1957, ch. 116, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-3.

Subject to governmental limitations, actual usability of waters is limit of public's right. —

This section indicates the legislature was aware that, without regard to their being navigable or nonnavigable in the federal sense or any other concept of navigability, its waters were usable for purposes other than irrigation, consumption, power or mining, and the waters might be used for transportation by flotation. So it would seem that subject to whatever statutory limitations may be imposed by the state on such use, or by the federal government when interstate or international rights are involved, the actual usability of the waters is alone the limit of the public's right to so employ them. Day v. Armstrong, 362 P.2d 137,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1961).

Priority includes quality. —

Priority of right in water includes quality as well as quantity and an oil producer has no right to deteriorate quality of water in stream as against persons lower down having priority, even though there is no negligence. Sussex Land & Live Stock Co. v. Midwest Refining Co., 294 F. 597, 1923 U.S. App. LEXIS 2531 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1923).

Change in permit not condemnation. —

An action to change water permits from a beneficial to a preferred use for municipal purposes is not a condemnation proceeding under this section. Town of Newcastle v. Smith, 28 Wyo. 371, 205 P. 302,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1922).

Cited

in

Groo v. Sights, 22 Wyo. 19, 134 P. 269,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(1913).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Concept of Beneficial Use in the Law of Surface Streams,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 1 (1957).

For comment, “‘It's Our Water!’ — Can Wyoming Constitutionally Prohibit the Exportation of State Waters?,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 119 (1975).

For comment, “Changing Manner and Place of Use of Water Rights in Wyoming,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1975).

For casenote, “Water Rights — Impairment of Existing Water Rights Under the Wyoming Watershed Act: Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 83 (1984).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
113.02 (Matthew Bender).

§ 41-3-103.
Preferred uses; procedure for change of use.

Where it can be shown to the board of control under the provisions hereof [§§

41-3-101

through

41-3-103

], that a preferred use is to be made, the procedure for a change of such use shall embrace a public notice, an inspection and hearing if necessary by and before the proper division superintendent, a report of such superintendent to the board of control, and an order by said board. If the change of use is approved, just compensation shall be paid and under the direction of the board, proper instruments shall be drawn and recorded.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 68, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 726; C.S. 1920, § 834; R.S. 1931, § 122-403; C.S. 1945, § 71-403; W.S. 1957, § 41-4.

Cross references. —

As to water rights appurtenant to lands to be subdivided, see §

18-5-306

.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1909, ch. 68, § 4, repealed Laws 1905, ch. 97.

Cited

in

Groo v. Sights, 22 Wyo. 19, 134 P. 269,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(1913).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Changing Manner and Place of Use of Water Rights in Wyoming,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 455 (1975).

For casenote, “Water Rights — Impairment of Existing Water Rights Under the Wyoming Watershed Act: Associated Enters., Inc. v. Toltec Watershed Imp. Dist., 656 P.2d 1144,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 83 (1984).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
113.02 (Matthew Bender).